Mississippi statutes. Title 1. Laws and Statutes
Supplementation of Code of 1972 and Update of Computer Tapes

§ 1-1-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 9, eff July 1, 1998.

§1-1-51. [Laws, 1973, ch, 366, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996)].

§ 1-1-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effectiveJuly 1, 1998.

§1-1-53. [Laws, 1973, ch. 366, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).]

§ 1-1-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by operation of law on July 1, 1998.

§1-1-55. [Laws, 1973, ch. 366, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).]

§ 1-1-57.
Purchase and distribution of pocket part supplements and replacement bound volumes.

The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation shall purchase such numbers of sets of the pocket part supplements and the replacement volumes, including index replacement volumes, as may be required to maintain in a current status the sets of the Code of 1972 authorized to be furnished under the provisions of Section 1-1-11, and shall distribute or provide for the distribution of the same to the proper parties. In furtherance of the State Library’s reciprocal program of Code exchange with libraries of the several states, the joint committee shall, at the direction and only upon the written request of the State Librarian, distribute or provide for the distribution of those supplements and replacement volumes to such libraries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 366, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 323, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 12; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-58.
Advance sheets; contract for publication; distribution; provision of information to publisher.

The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation shall contract with a publishing company for the publication of the advance sheets of the general laws enacted at each session of the Legislature. This contract may be with the same publishing company contracted with under Section 1-1-107(a) and may be included as a provision of that contract with the publishing company instead of being a separate contract.

The joint committee shall distribute or provide for the distribution of the advance sheets to the proper parties. One (1) volume of the advance sheets shall be provided free of cost to each state government agency, to each respective Legislative Services Office of the House of Representatives and the Senate, to the Legislative Reference Bureau, and to each sheriff, chancery clerk, circuit clerk, superintendent of education, tax assessor, county prosecuting attorney, justice court judge, attorney for each county’s board of supervisors, each municipal clerk, district attorney, circuit judge, chancellor, county court judge and Supreme Court judge. The joint committee shall authorize the publishing company to make copies of the advance sheets available to each member of the Mississippi Bar Association in good standing, according to the records of the secretary of the Mississippi Bar Association, at a reasonable cost, including preparation, printing, shipping and handling.

The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide or make available to the publishing company such information regarding the general laws enacted by the Legislature as necessary for the publishing company to prepare and publish the advance sheets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-59.
Provision and maintenance of Code in electronic form.

The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation may contract with a reputable and competent company to perform any services necessary to update any computer tape, disc or other technological medium furnished with the Mississippi Code of 1972, and to provide for and update a CD-ROM (compact disc, read-only memory) or other disc or technological medium containing the Mississippi Code of 1972 and its annotations, so that all laws of a general nature passed by the Legislature subsequent to the 1971 Session thereof will be incorporated therein in the same format as the pocket part supplements and supplemental material contained in replacement volumes to the Code of 1972. This contract may be made with the same publishing company contracted with under Section 1-1-107(a) and may be included as a provision of that contract with the publishing company instead of being a separate contract.

If the same cannot be contracted for, at and for a consideration considered reasonable, the joint committee may request the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to perform such services and pay over to the department such sums as may be appropriated for such purposes, and the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may expend such sums as paid over for the employment of personnel and the purchase of such services, supplies, materials and equipment as may be required to perform the work.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 366, § 5; Laws, 1979, ch. 323, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 13; Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-60.
Requisitions from University of Mississippi law school; publication exchanges with other states.

The dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi may make requisitions to the Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation for the Mississippi Code and supplements thereto to exchange with other states for similar publications and make the same available in the University of Mississippi law school library for the purpose of increasing the facilities of the library. The joint committee may furnish or provide for the furnishing of these publications upon requisition from the dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 1-1-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1996, ch. 502, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§1-1-61. [Laws, 1973, ch. 366, § 6]

§ 1-1-62.
Number of volumes, supplements, and advance sheets required.

The Joint Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation shall provide for the publication of sufficient volumes of the Mississippi Code and supplements thereto and advance sheets as necessary to meet the requirements of Sections 1-1-11, 1-1-57, 1-1-58 and 1-1-60.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1998.